test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-МО_А-студент_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - студент M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: студе́нт
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: студе́нта
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: студе́нта
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: студе́нте
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: студе́нту
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: студе́нтом
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: студе́нты
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Anim: студе́нтов
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: студе́нтов
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: студе́нтах
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: студе́нтам
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: студе́нтами
